Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 9 Osteopathic Physicians
63-9-113. Supervised osteopathic medical service by physician assistant, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or pharmacist not prohibited.

Nothing in this chapter shall be so construed as to prohibit osteopathic medical service rendered by a physician assistant, registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse, or a pharmacist pursuant to a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement, if such osteopathic medical service is rendered under the supervision, control and responsibility of a licensed osteopathic physician.

Acts 1992, ch. 604, § 5; 2014, ch. 832, § 6.

63-9-114. [Repealed.]

Acts 1996, ch. 1042, § 1; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 4, § 2, effective March 15, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-9-114 concerned medical review committee confidentiality.

63-9-115. Special volunteer license for practice in free health clinic — Exemption from fees — Renewal.

A physician licensed pursuant to this chapter under a special volunteer license who is a medical practitioner, as defined by § 63-1-201, engaged in practice at a free health clinic shall not be subject to license fees under this chapter. The board of osteopathic examination may issue a special volunteer license, as such license is defined in § 63-1-201, to qualified applicants without fee or charge. Such license shall be for a period of two (2) years and may be renewed on a biennial basis.

Acts 2004, ch. 579, § 3.

63-9-116. Drug prescriptions.

Any handwritten prescription order for a drug prepared by an osteopathic physician who is authorized by law to prescribe a drug must be legible so that it is comprehensible by the pharmacist who fills the prescription. The handwritten prescription order must contain the name of the prescribing osteopathic physician, the name and strength of the drug prescribed, the quantity of the drug prescribed, handwritten in letters or in numerals, instructions for the proper use of the drug and the month and day that the prescription order was issued, recorded in letters or in numerals or a combination thereof. The prescribing osteopathic physician must sign the handwritten prescription order on the day it is issued, unless the prescription order is:

Issued as a standing order in a hospital, a nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201; or

Prescribed by an osteopathic physician in the department of health or local health departments or dispensed by the department of health or a local health department as stipulated in § 63-10-205.

Any typed or computer-generated prescription order for a drug issued by an osteopathic physician who is authorized by law to prescribe a drug must be legible so that it is comprehensible by the pharmacist who fills the prescription order. The typed or computer-generated prescription order must contain the name of the prescribing osteopathic physician, the name and strength of the drug prescribed, the quantity of the drug prescribed, recorded in letters or in numerals, instructions for the proper use of the drug and the month and day that the typed or computer-generated prescription order was issued, recorded in letters or in numerals or a combination thereof. The prescribing osteopathic physician must sign the typed or computer-generated prescription order on the day it is issued, unless the prescription order is:

Issued as a standing order in a hospital, nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201; or

Prescribed by an osteopathic physician in the department of health or local health departments or dispensed by the department of health or a local health department as stipulated in § 63-10-205.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an osteopathic physician from issuing a verbal prescription order.

All handwritten, typed or computer-generated prescription orders must be issued on either tamper-resistant prescription paper or printed utilizing a technology that results in a tamper-resistant prescription that meets the current centers for medicare and medicaid service guidance to state medicaid directors regarding § 7002(b) of the United States Troop Readiness, Veterans' Care, Katrina Recovery, and Iraq Accountability Appropriations Act of 2007, P.L. 110-28, and meets or exceeds specific TennCare requirements for tamper-resistant prescriptions.

Subdivision (d)(1) shall not apply to prescriptions written for inpatients of a hospital, outpatients of a hospital where the doctor or other person authorized to write prescriptions writes the order into the hospital medical record and then the order is given directly to the hospital pharmacy and the patient never has the opportunity to handle the written order, a nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201 or inpatients or residents of a mental health hospital or residential facility licensed under title 33 or individuals incarcerated in a local, state or federal correctional facility.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 7; 2005, ch. 12, § 6; 2008, ch. 1035, §§ 7, 9; 2010, ch. 795, § 16; 2013, ch. 74, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 1 provided that the title of the act is, and may be cited as, the “Medication Error Reduction Act of 2004”.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 2 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly to create a uniform standard that health care providers must follow in issuing written or electronic prescription orders. This standard is intended to reduce medication related errors, which represent a major source of medical errors in the health care system. The general assembly finds that reducing medical errors will result in greater safety for patients as well as cost savings for the health care system in this state. By adopting these standards, the general assembly intends to promote medical safety for all patients who are issued drug prescriptions in this state.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 11 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any practitioner’s or pharmacist’s ability to order the use of or distribute non-prescription drugs or devices otherwise in accordance with applicable law.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 12 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any professional nurse's ability to issue drugs in accordance with the provisions of § 63-7-124.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 13 provided that the department of health, division of health related boards and the board of pharmacy, are authorized to promulgate uniform rules to effect the purposes of this act in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The power and duty to enforce those rules shall be vested in the various boards that regulate health care providers affected by the act, in accordance with § 63-1-122 [repealed].

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 14 provided that the act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before July 1, 2004.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any practitioner's or pharmacist's ability to order the use of or distribute non-prescription drugs or devices otherwise in accordance with applicable law.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 10 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any professional nurse's ability to issue drugs in accordance with the provisions of § 63-7-124.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 11 provided that the department of health, division of health related boards and the board of pharmacy, are authorized to promulgate uniform rules to effect the purposes of the act in accordance with title 4, chapter 5. The power and duty to enforce those rules shall be vested in the various boards that regulate healthcare providers affected by the act, in accordance with § 63-1-122 [repealed].

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 19 provided that the act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before January 1, 2011.

63-9-117. Office-based surgery.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the board of osteopathic examination;

“Level II office-based surgery” means Level II surgery as defined by the board of osteopathic medical examination in its rules and regulations that is performed outside of a hospital, ambulatory surgical treatment center or other medical facility licensed by the department of health;

“Office-based surgery” means Level III surgery requiring a level of sedation beyond the level of sedation defined by the board of medical examiners as Level II surgery that is performed outside a hospital, an ambulatory surgical treatment center or other medical facility licensed by the department of health;

“Physician” means any person licensed under this chapter; and

“Surgical suite” means both the operating and recovery room or rooms located in a physician's office where Level III office-based surgery is to be performed.

The board shall have the duty and responsibility to regulate the practice of office-based surgery, including the promulgation of rules necessary to promote patient health and safety in such practices, including, but not limited to, a mechanism by which all office-based surgical suites are surveyed and certified by the board.

The board shall specifically identify in rules the parameters to be used in determining Level III surgical procedures and multiple procedures that may be performed in an office-based setting pursuant to the level of anesthesia involved in the procedures. In addition, the board shall promulgate age and risk classification criteria of patients eligible for Level III office-based surgical procedures.

By December 30, 2007, the board shall adopt rules establishing a specific list of approved Level III surgical procedures that can be performed in a physician's office in this state. The ambulatory surgical center covered procedures list promulgated by the centers of medicare and medicaid shall be used as a guide. No physician shall perform any Level III surgical procedures that are not included on the list promulgated by the board. The board may modify the list as the board deems necessary. The board shall also promulgate rules addressing the minimum requirements deemed necessary by the board for the safe performance of office-based surgery.

Using the rules established for ambulatory surgical treatment centers as guidelines, the board shall promulgate rules relative to infection control, life safety, patient rights, hazardous waste and equipment and supplies necessary to assure the safety of patients undergoing office-based surgery. Any provision in the ambulatory surgical treatment center rules addressing infection control, life safety, patient rights, hazardous waste and equipment and supplies that is not adopted by the board shall require a statement entered into the official minutes from the board justifying the board's decision.

No more than three (3) patients undergoing Level III office-based surgery in a physician's office may be incapable of self-preservation at the same time. The board shall promulgate rules requiring physician offices that perform office-based surgery to adopt bylaws that put in place a management system and documentation that will insure that no more than three (3) patients that are in surgery or recovery are incapable of self-preservation at the same time. The bylaws and documentation of the management system shall be included in the application for surgical suite certification.

Except for emergencies, a surgical suite certified for office-based surgery may be utilized only by physician employees of the practice in which the surgical suite is located. Surgical suites may not be shared with other practices or other physicians.

The board shall enter into a memorandum of understanding, contract or other written arrangement with the department of health such that the department:

Provides a site survey of the surgical suites sought to be certified to perform office-based surgery. A physician office at which office-based surgeries are being performed as of October 1, 2007, shall submit both a request for a site survey on an application form developed by the board and remit payment of the office-based surgery fee to the department by October 1, 2007. If the office makes a timely filing in accordance with this subdivision (h)(1), the physician's office may continue to be a site for office-based surgeries pending completion of a survey confirming compliance with board rules and subsequent issuance of a certification of the surgical suite or suites. A physician office at which office-based surgeries are not being performed as of October 1, 2007, shall not perform any such procedures until an application form and payment of the office-based surgery fee is submitted to the board and a site survey is completed by the department and a certification of the surgical suite is issued by the board;

Is authorized to require plans of correction and to verify that the plans of correction have been implemented;

Is authorized to initiate subsequent, unannounced site surveys during regular business hours as long as the physician office continues to be used to perform office-based surgeries, but no more frequently than once every twelve (12) months; and

Is authorized to respond to any complaints made by patients or the public against a physician who performs office-based surgery or a physician's office at which office-based surgery is being performed at the request of the office of investigations.

The results of all site surveys shall be transmitted by the department to the board. The results shall include any requirement for plans of correction, the department's determination of the acceptability of the submitted plans of correction, and the department's verification that the plans of correction have been implemented. The board shall make a final determination on certifying the surgical suite for performance of office-based surgeries. The results of site surveys and board determinations shall be shared on a routine basis with the board for licensing health care facilities.

The results of all complaint investigations by department staff shall be transmitted to the board for resolution; however, the information shall at all times be maintained as confidential and not available to the public except to the extent § 63-1-117(b) applies.

Any physician office that desires to be certified to perform office-based surgery shall pay to the department an annual office-based surgery fee as set by the board.

A physician office at which office-based surgery is being performed shall ensure that claims data is reported to the commissioner of health on a form approved by the department of health. The data shall be submitted through a third party approved by the department of health for the purpose of editing the data according to rules and regulations established by the commissioner. The physician office shall be responsible for the costs associated with processing of the data by the approved vendors. The claims data shall be reported at least quarterly to the commissioner. No information shall be made available to the public by the commissioner that reasonably could be expected to reveal the identity of any patient. The claims data reported to the commissioner under this section are confidential and not available to the public until the commissioner processes and verifies the data. The commissioner shall prescribe conditions under which the processed and verified data are available to the public.

Except as provided in subdivision (h)(1), a physician office surgical suite is required to be certified by the board in order to perform office-based surgery. A physician office that proposes to perform the surgery shall submit to the board, on an application form provided by the board, at least the following:

Level III procedures expected to be performed by each physician;

The specialty board certification or board eligibility of the physician or physicians performing Level III procedures, if any;

Verification of health care liability coverage for all physicians performing Level III procedures;

Verification of hospital staff privileges for all physicians performing Level III procedures;

The name of a responsible physician in whose name the surgical suite certification shall be issued for that office and a list of the physicians with the practice who are going to be performing Level III office-based surgeries; and

The documentation required by subsection (f) regarding incapacitated patient limits.

The form required by subdivision (m)(1) shall serve as an application form, but the information on the form shall be updated as appropriate when any information on it has changed.

The board shall notify all physicians of the office-based surgery certification requirements. Failure of a physician performing office-based surgery, or a physician office at which office-based surgery is being performed, to abide by this section, any rules promulgated pursuant to this section or of § 68-11-211 may be grounds for disciplinary action or termination of either the rights of the physician to perform office-based surgery or the surgical suite's certification by the physician's licensing board, or both disciplinary action and termination. For purposes of § 4-5-320(c), the public health, safety and welfare imperatively require emergency action at any time that a previously authorized surgical suite fails to maintain the standards set by the board.

Applicants for initial licensure or reinstatement of a previously issued license shall indicate to the board on the appropriate licensure application if they intend to perform Level II office-based surgery procedures as defined by the rules of the board of osteopathic examination and that are integral to a planned treatment regimen and not performed on an urgent or emergent basis.

Licensed osteopathic physicians who perform Level II office-based surgery at the time of licensure renewal shall indicate to the board on the licensure renewal application if the licensee currently performs Level II office-based surgery procedures as defined in the rules of the board of osteopathic examination and that are integral to a planned treatment regimen and not performed on an urgent or emergent basis.

In order for health care providers and the board to work together to collect meaningful health care data, so as to minimize the frequency and severity of certain unexpected events and improve the delivery of health care services, each osteopathic physician who performs any Level II office-based surgery that results in any of the following unanticipated events shall notify the board in writing within fifteen (15) calendar days following the physician's discovery of the event:

The death of a patient during any Level II office-based surgery or within seventy-two (72) hours thereafter;

The transport of a patient to a hospital emergency department except those related to a natural course of the patient's illness or underlying condition;

The unplanned admission of a patient to a hospital within seventy-two (72) hours of discharge, only if the admission is related to the Level II office-based surgery except those related to a natural course of the patient's illness or underlying condition;

The discovery of a foreign object erroneously remaining in a patient from a Level II office-based surgery at that office; or

The performance of the wrong surgical procedure, surgery on the wrong site or surgery on the wrong patient.

Records of reportable events should be in writing and should include at a minimum the following:

The physician's name and license number;

The date and time of the occurrence or discovery of the incident;

The office and address where the incident took place;

The name and address of the patient;

The type of Level II office-based surgery that was performed;

The type and dosage of sedation or anesthesia utilized during the procedure;

The circumstances surrounding the incident; and

The type or types of events required to be reported as provided in subsection (q).

The filing of a report as required by subsection (q) does not, in and of itself, constitute an acknowledgement or admission of health care liability, error or omission. Upon receipt of the report, the board may, in its discretion, obtain patient and other records pursuant to authority granted to it in § 63-1-117. The reporting form and any supporting documentation reviewed or obtained by the board pursuant to this section and any amendments to the reports shall be confidential and not subject to discovery, subpoena or legal compulsion for release to any person or entity; nor shall they be admissible in any civil or administrative proceeding, other than a disciplinary proceeding by the board; nor shall they be subject to any open records request made pursuant to title 10, chapter 7, part 5 or any other law. This section shall not affect any of the provisions of or limit the protections provided by § 63-1-150.

Failure to comply with the requirements of subsections (o)-(s) constitutes grounds for disciplinary action by the board in its discretion pursuant to § 63-9-111.

Acts 2007, ch. 373, § 5; 2008, ch. 927, §§ 3, 4; 2012, ch. 798, §§ 43, 44; 2017, ch. 4, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 373, § 6 provided that the board of medical examiners and the board of osteopathic examination are authorized to promulgate public necessity rules (now emergency rules) necessary to carry out the provisions of the act in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “provided by § 63-1-150” for “provided by §§ 63-6-219 [repealed] and 63-9-114” at the end of (s).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 4, § 11. March 15, 2017.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

63-9-118. [Repealed.]

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 5; repealed by Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 8, effective January 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Section 63-9-118 concerning prescriptions for Schedule II controlled substances is repealed by Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 8, effective January 1, 2019.

Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 10 provided that the commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. All rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, title 4, chapter 5.

Former § 63-6-239 concerned prescriptions for Schedule II controlled substances.

63-9-119. Employee or contractor's unauthorized use of osteopathic physician's DEA registration number to write prescriptions.

Any osteopathic physician licensed pursuant to this chapter who has reason to believe that an employee or contractor of the physician or the physician's firm, partnership or corporation has used the physician's federal drug enforcement administration (DEA) registration number without authorization to write prescriptions may make a report to a law enforcement agency.

Any osteopathic physician, firm, partnership, or corporation making a report pursuant to subsection (a) shall be immune from any civil liability for making such report when made in good faith.

Acts 2012, ch. 818, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 836, § 2 purported to enact § 63-9-119. Section 63-9-119 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 818, § 2; therefore, Acts 2012, ch. 836, § 2 was enacted as § 63-9-120 by authority of the code commission.

Acts 2012, ch. 961, § 5 purported to enact a new § 63-9-119. Section 63-9-119 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 818, § 2, and § 63-9-120 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 836, § 2; therefore, Acts 2012, ch. 961, § 5 was enacted as § 63-9-121 by authority of the code commission.

63-9-120.
Hormone replacement therapy.

“Hormone replacement therapy clinic” or “hormone therapy clinic” means a medical office in which the clinicians are primarily engaged in hormone replacement or supplementation therapy or a medical office which holds itself out to the public as being primarily or substantially engaged in hormone replacement therapy. For the purposes of this definition, “primarily engaged” means that a majority of the clinic's patients receive hormone replacement therapy and may be further defined by the board by rule. “Hormone replacement therapy clinic” does not mean a medical office in which the clinicians are primarily engaged in obstetrics and gynecology (OB/GYN), urology or primary care.

“Hormone replacement therapy” or “hormone therapy” means the branch of the practice of medicine whereby the patient is treated with medications that include, but are not limited to, creams or natural formulas taken through the skin, under the tongue, in subcutaneous pellets, or orally that contain hormones that have the same bioidentical or similar chemical formula as those produced naturally in the human body or that the provider thinks or claims to be similar or identical, but shall not include the treatment of patients with birth control pills.

In hormone replacement therapy clinics:

All hormone replacement therapy shall be performed by a physician licensed under chapter 6 of this title or this chapter, or delegated by such physician to a certified nurse practitioner licensed pursuant to chapter 7 of this title or a physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 19 of this title; and

If hormone replacement therapy is delegated, the supervising physician shall ensure that written protocols are developed for licensees to whom hormone replacement therapy is delegated, that such protocols are updated as necessary and that the patient is informed of both the name and contact information of the supervising physician and an indication of whether the physician is available onsite or remotely.

A physician supervising hormone replacement therapy in a hormone replacement therapy clinic shall ensure that for each patient, all of the following requirements are met:

Prior to the initial hormone replacement therapy or course of treatments, an appropriate physical examination shall be conducted;

An appropriate medical history shall be taken and documented on the patient;

A written order for hormone replacement therapy shall be entered by the treating provider in the patient's medical record documenting the diagnosis and medical reason for the patient's need for hormone replacement therapy. If the treating provider is not a physician, the supervising physician shall make a personal review of the historical, physical and therapeutic data gathered by the treating provider and shall so certify the review in the patient's chart within seven (7) days of the patient being served;

The patient gives written consent for hormone replacement therapy, which includes notification of possible complications and reasonable expectations and any applicable FDA warnings associated with any part of the therapy; and

The supervising physician shall be immediately notified upon discovery of a complication.

Acts 2012, ch. 836, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 836, § 2 purported to enact § 63-9-119. Section 63-9-119 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 818, § 2; therefore, Acts 2012, ch. 836, § 2 was enacted as § 63-9-120 by authority of the code commission.

63-9-121. Interventional pain management.

A physician licensed in this chapter may only practice interventional pain management if the licensee is either:

Board certified through the American Osteopathic Association (AOA) or the American Board of Physician Specialties (ABPS)/American Association of Physician Specialists (AAPS) in one of the following medical specialties:

Anesthesiology;

Neuromusculoskeletal medicine;

Orthopedic surgery;

Physical medicine and rehabilitation;

Radiology; or

Any other board certified physician who has completed an ABMS subspecialty board in pain medicine or completed an ACGME-accredited pain fellowship;

A recent graduate of a medical specialty listed in subdivision (a)(1) not yet eligible to apply for AOA or ABPS/AAPS specialty certification; provided, that there is a practice relationship with an osteopathic physician who meets the requirements of subdivision (a)(1) or a physician who meets the requirements of § 63-6-244(a)(1);

A licensee who is not board certified in one of the specialties listed in subdivision (a)(1) but is board certified in a different AOA or ABPS/AAPS specialty and has completed a post-graduate training program in interventional pain management approved by the board;

A licensee who serves as a clinical instructor in pain medicine at an accredited Tennessee medical training program; or

A licensee who has an active pain management practice in a clinic accredited in outpatient interdisciplinary pain rehabilitation by the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities or any successor organization.

For purposes of this section, interventional pain management is the practice of performing invasive procedures involving any portion of the spine, spinal cord, sympathetic nerves of the spine or block of major peripheral nerves of the spine in any setting not licensed under title 68, chapter 11.

The board is authorized to define through rulemaking the scope and length of the practice relationship established in subdivision (a)(2).

An osteopathic physician who provides direct supervision of an advanced practice registered nurse or a physician's assistant pursuant to § 63-7-126 or § 63-19-107 must meet the requirements set forth in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(3).

An osteopathic physician who violates this section is subject to disciplinary action by the board pursuant to § 63-9-111, including, but not limited to, civil penalties of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for every day this section is violated.

Acts 2012, ch. 961, § 5; 2016, ch. 980, § 18.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 961, § 5 purported to enact a new § 63-9-119. Section 63-9-119 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 818, § 2, and § 63-9-120 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 836, § 2; therefore, Acts 2012, ch. 961, § 5 was enacted as § 63-9-121 by authority of the code commission.

63-9-122. Exemption for physician for visiting sports team.

A physician who is duly qualified to practice medicine under the laws of another state is exempt from the licensure requirements of § 63-9-104, subject to this section, if either of the following applies:

The physician has a written or oral agreement with a sports team to provide care to team members and coaching staff traveling with the team for a specific sporting event to take place in this state; or

The physician has been invited by a national sport governing body to provide services to athletes and coaching staff at a national sport training center in this state or to provide services to athletes and coaching staff at an event or competition in this state that is sanctioned by the national sport governing body.

The exemption provided by this section only applies while:

The physician's practice is limited to that required by the team or the national sport governing body; and

The services provided by the physician are within the physician's scope of practice.

The exemption provided by subsection (a) permits a physician to provide care or consultation to a person specified in subsection (a). Nothing in this section permits a physician exempt by this section to:

Provide care or consultation to any person residing in this state other than a person specified in subsection (a); or

Practice at a licensed healthcare facility in this state.

An exemption pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) is valid while the physician is traveling with the sports team, subject to the following:

The exemption shall not be longer than ten (10) days in duration for each respective sporting event without prior authorization from the board of osteopathic examination;

The board of osteopathic examination may grant an extension of not more than twenty (20) additional days per sporting event; and

No physician shall be exempt for more than thirty (30) total days in a calendar year.

An exemption pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) is valid during the time certified by the national sport governing body; however, no physician shall be exempt for more than thirty (30) total days in a calendar year.

No physician exempt pursuant to this section shall dispense or administer controlled substances unless:

The patient to whom the controlled substance is administered or dispensed is over eighteen (18) years of age and is a person described in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2); and

The physician reports all controlled substances dispensed or administered to any applicable state controlled substance database in the physician's state of licensure.

For purposes of this section, “sports team” means a professional, semi-professional, or amateur team including, but not limited to, a college, high school, grade school, or non-school affiliated team, such as those associated with the Amateur Athletic Union (AAU).

The board of osteopathic examination may enter into agreements with medical licensing boards of other states to implement this section. Agreements may include procedures for reporting potential medical license violations.

The board of osteopathic examination may promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this section. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2017, ch. 329, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 329, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Visiting Sports Team Act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 329, § 4. January 1, 2018; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 9, 2017.

63-9-123. Maintenance of licensure or certification not required.

As used in this section:

“Continuing medical education” means continued postgraduate medical education required by the board of osteopathic medical examination intended to provide medical professionals with knowledge of new developments or reinforcement of previously learned information in their field;

“Maintenance of certification” means any process requiring periodic recertification examinations or other activities to maintain specialty medical board certification;

“Maintenance of licensure” means the proprietary framework for physician license renewal established through the Federation of State Medical Boards or its successor organization, which includes additional periodic testing or requirements other than continuing medical education; and

“Specialty medical board certification” means certification by a board that specializes in one (1) particular area of medicine and typically requires additional examinations other than the board of osteopathic examination's requirements to practice medicine.

The board shall not deny a physician licensure based on a physician's non-participation in any form of maintenance of licensure, including requiring any form of maintenance of licensure tied to maintenance of certification. The board's regular requirements, including continuing medical education, demonstrate professional competency.

The board shall not require any form of specialty medical board recertification or any maintenance of certification to practice medicine in this state.

Acts 2017, ch. 438, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 438, § 4. May 25, 2017.